Massachusetts, session 194th, H5545.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
ORDERED that pursuant to M.G.L., Chapter 89 Section 8 of the Massachusetts
Constitution, that allows the legislative body of the Town of Bridgewater to vote to submit a
Special Act to the State Legislature to Amend the current Bridgewater Town Charter; the Town
Council voted to amend said Town Charter Article IV Section 4-1 as follows:
Add the following language:
The Town Council shall appoint by a majority vote of the full Town Council, a Town
Manager for a term not to exceed three (3) years, which may be renewed for additional terms of
up to three (3) years each upon a majority vote of the full Town Council, subject to the
procedures for appointment and removal outlined in this Article.
of 2

Said Amendment shall only become effective and it contingent upon approval by the
Town Council, the State Legislature and the voters of the Town of Bridgewater.
of 2